Connecticut, session 2026, HB05137.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to establish a refundable tax
credit to news organizations that cover local communities in the state,
in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars per journalist employed in the
state by such organization and twenty-five thousand dollars per new
journalist hired in the state by such organization, with a cap on the
amount a news organization is allowed of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars.